Utah statutes.
7-1-322.   Orders of commissioner -- Writing -- Service -- Contents -- Enforcement.

Any order issued by the commissioner under authority of this title shall be in writing, delivered to the institution or institutions affected and shall state the findings of the commissioner and the action required. The order shall specify the effective date thereof, which may be immediate or may be at a later date, and such order shall remain in effect until withdrawn by the commissioner or until terminated by a court order. The order of the commissioner, upon application made on or after the effective date of the order by the commissioner to a court of general jurisdiction in the county in which the principal office of the institution is located, may be enforced ex parte and without notice by an order to comply entered by the court.



Enacted by Chapter 16, 1981 General Session

